District of Columbia statutes.
3-2501

Repealed

Plumbing Board authorized; appointment; composition.

Repealed.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1237, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 2-2101.

This section was previously omitted.

D.C. Law 12-261, Title I, § 1237 provided: “Sec. 1237. An Act To regulate plumbing and gasfitting in the District of Columbia, approved June 18, 1898 (30 Stat. 477; D.C. Code § 2-2101 et seq. § 3-2501 et seq., 2001 Ed. ), is repealed and authority thereunder is transferred to the Board of Industrial Trades established by D.C. Code § 47-2853.6 [§ 47-2853.06, 2001 Ed.].”